Idaho, session 2025, H0091.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 16-1640, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 37-120, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 37-132, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 37-134, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 37-2510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 37-2749, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 31, Title 37, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 39-251, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 39-254, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 39-601A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 39-603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 39-606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 39-609, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 31-873, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 15. That Section 39-907, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 16. That Section 39-1212, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 17. That Section 39-1223, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 18. That Section 39-1308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 19. That Section 39-1314, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 20. That Sections 39-1401 through 39-1417, Idaho Code, be, and
the same are hereby repealed.
SECTION 21. That Section 39-1802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 22. That Chapter 32, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 23. That Section 39-3306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 24. That Section 39-3354, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 25. That Section 39-3354A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 26. That Section 39-3355, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 27. That Section 39-4607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 28. That Section 39-4805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 29. That Chapter 49, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 30. That Chapter 51, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 31. That Chapter 56, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 32. That Section 39-8207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 33. That Section 56-104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 34. That Section 56-114, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 35. That Section 56-116, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 36. That Section 56-118, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 37. That Section 56-131, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 38. That Section 56-135, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 39. That Section 56-206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 40. That Section 56-209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 41. That Section 56-209a, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 42. That Section 56-209d, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 43. That Section 56-209e, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 44. That Section 56-209f, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 45. That Section 56-214A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 46. That Section 56-216, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 47. That Section 56-217, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 48. That Section 56-220, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 49. That Section 56-222, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 50. That Section 56-224, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 51. That Section 56-225, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 52. That Section 56-227D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 53. That Section 56-228, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 54. That Section 56-229, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 55. That Section 56-233, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 56. That Section 56-235E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 57. That Section 56-252, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 58. That Section 56-262, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 59. That Section 56-264, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 60. That Chapter 3, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 61. That Section 56-1038, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 62. That Section 56-1040, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 63. That Section 56-1054, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 64. That Section 56-1403, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1403. HOSPITAL ASSESSMENT FUND ESTABLISHED. (1) There is hereby
created in the office of the state treasurer a dedicated fund to be known as
the hospital assessment fund, hereinafter "fund," to be administered by the
department of health and welfare, hereinafter "department." The state trea-
surer shall invest idle moneys in the fund and any interest received on those
investments shall be returned to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys collected or received by the department from private
hospital assessments required by this chapter;
(b) All federal matching funds received by the department as a result
of expenditures made by the department that are attributable to moneys
deposited in the fund;
(c) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction with the adminis-
tration of this chapter; and
(d) Any appropriations, federal funds, donations, gifts or moneys from
any other sources.


(3) The fund is created for the purpose of receiving moneys in accor-
dance with this section and section 56-1404, Idaho Code. Moneys in the fund
shall be distributed by the department subject to appropriation for the fol-
lowing purposes only:
(a) Payments to private hospitals as required under Idaho's medical as-
sistance program as set forth in sections 56-209b through 56-209d and
56-209c, Idaho Code;
(b) Reimbursement of moneys collected by the department from private
hospitals through error or mistake in performing the activities autho-
rized under Idaho's medical assistance program;
(c) Payments of administrative expenses incurred by the department or
its agent in performing the activities authorized by this chapter;
(d) Payments made to the federal government to repay excess payments
made to private hospitals from the fund if the assessment plan is deemed
out of compliance and after the state has appealed the findings. Hospi-
tals shall refund the payments in question to the assessment fund. The
state in turn shall return funds to both the federal government and hos-
pital providers in the same proportion as the original financing. Indi-
vidual hospitals shall be reimbursed based on the proportion of the in-
dividual hospital's assessment to the total assessment paid by all pri-
vate hospitals. If a hospital is unable to refund payments, the state
shall develop a payment plan and deduct moneys from future medicaid pay-
ments;
(e) Transfers to any other fund in the state treasury, provided such
transfers shall not exceed the amount transferred previously from that
other fund into the hospital assessment fund; and
(f) Making refunds to hospitals pursuant to section 56-1410, Idaho
Code; and
(g) (f) Offsetting general funding needed to support Idaho medicaid.
SECTION 65. That Section 56-1404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1404. ASSESSMENTS. (1) All private hospitals, except those ex-
empted under section 56-1408, Idaho Code, shall make payments to the fund in
accordance with this chapter. Subject to section 56-1410, Idaho Code, an An
annual assessment on both inpatient and outpatient services is determined
for each qualifying hospital for each state fiscal year in an amount calcu-
lated by multiplying the rate, as set forth in subsections (2)(c) and (3)(b)
of this section, by the assessment base, as set forth in subsection (5) of
this section.
(2)(a) The department shall calculate the private hospital upper pay-
ment limit gap for both inpatient and outpatient services. The upper
payment limit gap is the difference between the maximum allowable pay-
ments eligible for federal match, less medicaid payments not financed
using hospital assessment funds. The upper payment limit gap shall be
calculated separately for hospital inpatient and outpatient services.
Medicaid disproportionate share payments shall be excluded from the
calculation.
(b) Idaho medicaid will start work toward approval by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services (CMS) of an updated upper payment limit


calculation methodology no later than July 1, 2022. This change is
needed due to the change reflected in section 56-265, Idaho Code, in re-
imbursement from retrospective cost settlements to prospective payment
systems.
(c) The department shall calculate the upper payment limit assessment
rate for each state fiscal year to be the percentage that, when multi-
plied by the assessment base as defined in subsection (5) of this sec-
tion, equals the upper payment limit payment.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2022, or upon approval by CMS, whichever is later,
the assessment rate referenced in paragraph (c) of this subsection will
increase to the amount needed to attain an increased supplemental upper
payment limit payment. This payment amount is subject to CMS approval
of the updated upper payment limit methodology described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection and legislative appropriation.
(e) Beginning July 1, 2023, an additional amount will be assessed at
thirty percent (30%) of the upper payment limit payment to be utilized
for general fund medicaid needs.
(f) If CMS does not approve the updated upper payment limit methodology
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, then the additional as-
sessment described in paragraph (e) of this subsection shall not be im-
plemented.
(g) The assessment described in paragraph (e) of this subsection shall
be assessed only if the upper payment limit payment is greater than the
total assessment.
(3)(a) The department shall calculate the disproportionate share al-
lotment amount to be paid to private in-state hospitals.
(b) The department shall calculate the disproportionate share assess-
ment rate for private in-state hospitals to be the percentage that, when
multiplied by the assessment base as defined in subsection (5) of this
section, equals the amount of state funding necessary to pay the private
in-state hospital disproportionate share allotment determined in para-
graph (a) of this subsection.
(4) For private in-state hospitals, the assessments calculated pur-
suant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not be greater than
the federal limit as referenced in 42 CFR 433.68 of the assessment base as
defined in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The assessment base shall be the hospital's net patient revenue
for the applicable period. Net patient revenue, beginning with state fis-
cal year 2023, shall be determined using each hospital's fiscal year 2021
medicare cost report on file with the department, without regard to any sub-
sequent adjustments or changes to such data. If the 2021 cost report has not
been filed, the prior year's cost report will be used. Net patient revenue
for each state fiscal year thereafter shall be determined in the same manner
using a rolling yearly schedule for each hospital's fiscal year medicare
cost report.
SECTION 66. That Section 56-1405, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 67. That Section 56-1407, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 68. That Section 56-1410, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 69. That Section 56-1502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 70. That Section 56-1504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1504. NURSING FACILITY ASSESSMENT FUND. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated in the office of the state treasurer a dedicated fund to be known as
the nursing facility assessment fund, hereinafter the "fund," to be adminis-
tered by the department. The state treasurer shall invest idle moneys in the
fund and any interest received on those investments shall be returned to the
fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys collected or received by the department from nursing fa-
cility assessments required pursuant to this chapter;
(b) All federal matching funds received by the department as a result
of expenditures made by the department that are attributable to moneys
deposited in the fund;
(c) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction with the adminis-
tration of this chapter; and
(d) Any appropriations, federal funds, donations, gifts or moneys from
any other sources.
(3) The fund is created for the purpose of receiving moneys in accor-
dance with this section and section 56-1511, Idaho Code. Collected assess-
ment funds shall be used to secure federal matching funds available through
the state medicaid plan, which funds shall be used to make medicaid payments
for nursing facility services that equal or exceed the amount of nursing fa-
cility medicaid rates, in the aggregate, as calculated in accordance with
the approved state medicaid plan in effect on June 30, 2009. The fund shall
be used exclusively for the following purposes:
(a) To pay administrative expenses incurred by the department or its
agent in performing the activities authorized pursuant to this chapter,
provided that such expenses shall not exceed a total of one percent (1%)
of the aggregate assessment funds collected for the prior fiscal year.
(b) To reimburse the medicaid share of the assessment in accordance
with IDAPA 16.03.10.264.
(c) To provide financial incentives for nursing facilities to improve
quality to be implemented as value-based purchasing payments in state
fiscal year 2021 based on performance data from the prior state fiscal
year, in accordance with section 56-1511, Idaho Code.
(d) To increase nursing facility payments to fund covered services to
medicaid beneficiaries within medicare upper payment limits, as nego-
tiated with the department.
(e) To repay the federal government any excess payments made to nursing
facilities if the state plan, once approved by CMS, is subsequently dis-
approved for any reason, and after the state has appealed the findings.
Nursing facilities shall refund the excess payments in question to the
assessment fund. The state, in turn, shall return funds to both the


federal government and nursing facility providers in the same propor-
tion as the original financing. Individual nursing facilities shall be
reimbursed based on the proportion of the individual nursing facility's
assessment to the total assessment paid by nursing facilities. If a
nursing facility is unable to refund payments, the state shall develop
a payment plan and deduct moneys from future medicaid payments. The
state will refund the federal government for the federal share of these
overpayments.
(f) To make refunds to nursing facilities pursuant to section 56-1507,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 71. That Section 56-1505, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1505. NURSING FACILITY ASSESSMENTS. (1) Nursing facilities shall
pay the nursing facility assessment to the fund in accordance with the provi-
sions of this chapter, with the exception of state and county-owned facili-
ties, which are not required to contribute.
(2) The aggregated amount of assessments for all nursing facilities,
during a fiscal year, shall be an amount not exceeding the maximum percentage
allowed under federal law of the total aggregate net patient service revenue
of assessed facilities from each provider's prior fiscal year. The depart-
ment shall determine the assessment rate prospectively for the applicable
fiscal year on a per-resident-day basis, exclusive of medicare part A resi-
dent days. The per-resident-day assessment rate shall be uniform. The de-
partment shall notify nursing facilities of the assessment rate applicable
to the fiscal year by August 30 of that fiscal year.
(3) The department shall collect, and each nursing facility shall pay,
the nursing facility assessment on an annual basis subject to the terms of
this subsection. The nursing facility assessment shall be due annually,
with the initial payment due within sixty (60) days after the state plan has
been approved by CMS. Subsequent annual payments are due no later than thirty
(30) days after receipt of the department invoice.
(4) Nursing facilities may increase their charges to other payers to
incorporate the assessment but shall not create a separate line-item charge
on the bill reflecting the assessment.
(5)(a) For state fiscal years 2020 and 2021, the department shall ad-
just assessments and payments for privately owned nursing facilities as
follows. The department shall:
(i) Increase nursing facility assessments by an amount adequate
to reduce state general fund needs by one million seven hundred
eighty-six thousand dollars ($1,786,000) in state fiscal year
2020 and five million dollars ($5,000,000) in state fiscal year
2021; and
(ii) Support provider rate adjustments that will offset the med-
icaid share of the assessment increase.
(b) The department shall work with nursing facility providers to col-
lect the increased assessments on a schedule to support state budget
needs and provider rate adjustments.


(c) Provider rate adjustments for state fiscal years 2020 and 2021
shall not be considered or carried forward for payments established
under section 56-116, Idaho Code.
SECTION 72. That Section 56-1506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 73. That Section 56-1507, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 74. That Section 56-1508, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 75. That Section 56-1510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 76. That Section 56-1511, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 77. That Section 56-1603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1603. INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITY ASSESSMENT FUND. (1) There is
hereby created in the office of the state treasurer a dedicated fund to be
known as the ICF assessment fund to be administered by the department. The
state treasurer shall invest idle moneys in the fund, and any interest re-
ceived on those investments shall be returned to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys collected or received by the department from ICF assess-
ments required pursuant to this chapter;
(b) All federal matching funds received by the department as a result
of expenditures made by the department that are attributable to moneys
deposited in the fund;
(c) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction with the adminis-
tration of this chapter; and
(d) Any appropriation or federal funds.
(3) The fund is created for the purpose of receiving moneys in accor-
dance with the provisions of this section and section 56-1604, Idaho Code.
The fund shall not be used to replace any moneys appropriated to the Idaho
medical assistance program by the legislature. Moneys in the fund, which
are deemed to be perpetually appropriated, shall be used exclusively for the
following purposes:
(a) To pay administrative expenses incurred by the department or its
agent in performing the activities authorized pursuant to this chapter,
provided that such expenses shall not exceed a total of one percent (1%)
of the aggregate assessment funds collected for the prior fiscal year.
(b) To reimburse the medicaid share of the assessment as a pass-
through.
(c) To secure federal matching funds available through the state med-
icaid plan, which funds shall be used to make medicaid payments for ICF
services that equal or exceed the amount of ICF medicaid rates, in the


aggregate, as calculated in accordance with the approved state medicaid
plan in effect on July 1, 2011.
(d) To increase ICF payments to fund covered services to medicaid bene-
ficiaries within medicare upper payment limits.
(e) To make refunds to ICFs pursuant to section 56-1607, Idaho Code. If
an ICF is unable to refund payments, the state shall develop a payment
plan and deduct moneys from future medicaid payments. The state will
refund the federal government for the federal share of these overpay-
ments.
(f) To make transfers to any other fund in the state treasury, provided
such transfers shall not exceed the amount transferred previously from
that other fund into the ICF assessment fund.
SECTION 78. That Section 56-1605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 79. That Section 56-1606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 80. That Section 56-1607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 81. That Section 56-1609, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 82. That Section 56-1610, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 83. That Section 66-409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 84. That Section 66-415, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 85. That Section 66-416, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 86. That Section 66-417, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 87. That Chapter 14, Title 66, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 88. That Chapter 31, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 89. That Chapter 34, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 90. That Section 67-6905, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 91. That Section 18-217, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-217. MENTAL HEALTH RECORDS OF OFFENDERS. (1) For purposes of care,
treatment or normal health care operations, records of mental health evalu-
ation, care and treatment shall be provided upon request to and from the men-
tal health professionals of a governmental entity and another entity provid-
ing care or treatment for any person who is:
(a) Under court commitment to a state agency pursuant to section
18-212(4), Idaho Code;
(b) A pretrial detainee;
(c) Awaiting sentencing;
(d) In the care, custody or supervision of any correctional facility as
defined in section 18-101A, Idaho Code;
(e) On probation or parole;
(f) Being supervised as part of a drug court, mental health court, juve-
nile detention program, work release program, or similar court program;
or
(g) Applying for mental health services after release from a correc-
tional facility.
(2) No court order or authorization from the offender to transfer the
records shall be required except for records of substance abuse treatment as
provided by pursuant to 42 CFR part 2, and sections 37-3102 and 39-308, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 92. That Section 31-874, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-874. PROCEEDINGS AND RECORDS OF MEDICAL INDIGENTS. All proceed-
ings and records related to medical indigency pursuant to the provisions of
section 31-873, Idaho Code, and chapters 34 and 35, title 31, Idaho Code,
shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code,
and shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.
SECTION 93. That Section 39-605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-605. RULES FOR CARRYING OUT LAW. The state board of health and
welfare is hereby empowered and directed to make such rules as shall, in
its judgment, be necessary for the carrying out of the provisions of this
chapter, including rules providing for the control and treatment of per-
sons isolated or quarantined under the provisions of section 39-603, Idaho
Code, and such other rules, not in conflict with provisions of this chap-
ter, concerning the control of venereal diseases, and concerning the care,
treatment and quarantine of persons infected therewith, as it may from time
to time deem advisable. All such rules so made shall be of force and binding
upon all county and municipal health officers and other persons affected by
this chapter, and shall have the force and effect of law. Such rules may be
amended from time to time by the state board of health and welfare. All rules
must be entered on the minutes of the state board of health and welfare and
copies shall be furnished to all county and municipal health officers and to


anyone else who may apply for same. Such rules shall be adopted and become
effective in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 94. That Section 39-610, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-610. DISCLOSURE OF HIV AND HBV REPORTING INFORMATION. (1) Confi-
dential public health record as described in section 39-606, Idaho Code,
shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code,
shall not be discoverable, and shall not be compelled to be produced in any
civil or administrative hearing.
(2) (1) State or local health authorities may contact and advise those
persons who, in the judgment of health authorities, have been exposed to the
HIV (human immunodeficiency virus) or hepatitis B (HBV) infections.
(3) (2) The department of health and welfare shall, in a manner estab-
lished by rules and regulations, accept from persons involved in providing
emergency or medical services reports of significant exposures to the blood
or body fluids of a patient or deceased person. The department of health and
welfare shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term "signifi-
cant exposure" as used in this section. Upon receipt of a report made pur-
suant to section 39-602, Idaho Code, confirming the presence of HIV or HBV
virus in a patient or a deceased person, the director of the department of
health and welfare, or his designee, shall immediately contact and advise
any and all persons who, on the basis of information then or thereafter re-
ported to the department, have had a significant exposure to the blood or
body fluids of that infected patient or deceased person. The significantly
exposed person shall be informed only that he may have been exposed to HIV or
HBV, as the case may be, and thereafter advised of whatever prophylactic and
testing procedures are appropriate. The significantly exposed person shall
not be informed of the name of the infected patient or deceased person. Addi-
tionally, the department of health and welfare shall, to the greatest extent
consistent with public health requirements, maintain the confidentiality of
the identity of the significantly exposed person.
(4) (3) Public health authorities may disclose personally identifying
information in public health records, as described in section 39-606, Idaho
Code, to other local or state public health agencies when the confidential
information is necessary to carry out the duties of the agency in the inves-
tigation, control and surveillance of disease, as determined by the state
board of health and welfare, or as otherwise authorized by law.
(5) (4) Nothing in this chapter imposes liability or criminal sanction
for disclosure or nondisclosure of the results of a blood test to detect HIV
or HBV virus in accordance with any reporting requirements of the department
of health and welfare.
SECTION 95. That Section 39-1219, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1219. APPEAL FROM DECISION OF DIRECTOR. If an applicant or licensee
feels aggrieved by a decision rendered as a result of a hearing, as provided
in section 39-1218, Idaho Code, appeal may be taken to the district court of


the county in which the group or foster home, facility, program or agency is
located, in the manner and form as provided in section 39-1212, chapter 52,
title 67, Idaho Code, provided, however, the filing of notice of appeal shall
not, unless otherwise ordered, stay the proceedings of the director.
SECTION 96. That Section 39-1302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1302. PURPOSE. The purpose of sections 39-1301--39-1314 through
39-1313, Idaho Code, is to provide for the development, establishment and
enforcement of standards (1) for the care and treatment of individuals in
facilities or by agencies as defined, and (2) for the construction, mainte-
nance and operation of facilities or agencies as defined which, in the light
of advancing knowledge, will promote safe and adequate treatment of such
individuals in facilities or by agencies as defined.
SECTION 97. That Section 39-1303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1303. LICENSURE. After January 1, 1948, no person or governmental
unit, acting severally or jointly with any other person or governmental
unit shall establish, conduct or maintain a facility or agency, as defined,
in this state without a license under sections 39-1301--39-1314 through
39-1313, Idaho Code.
SECTION 98. That Section 39-1308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1308. EFFECTIVE DATE OF REGULATIONS. Any facility or agency as de-
fined, which is in operation at the time of promulgation of any applicable
rules or regulations or minimum standards under sections 39-1301--39-1314
through 39-1313, Idaho Code, shall be given a reasonable time, not to exceed
two (2) years from the date of such promulgation, within which to comply with
such rules and regulations and minimum standards, except for those condi-
tions which present an imminent hazard to the health and safety of patients
housed therein.
SECTION 99. That Section 39-1312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1312. PENALTY FOR OPERATING A FACILITY OR AGENCY WITHOUT LI-
CENSE. (1) Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating
any facility or agency as defined, without a license under sections
39-1301--39-1314 through 39-1313, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misde-
meanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of time not
exceeding six (6) months, or by a fine not exceeding three hundred dollars
($300), or by both, and each day of continuing violations shall constitute
a separate offense.
(2) In the event that the county attorney in the county where the al-
leged violation occurred fails or refuses to act within sixty (60) days of


notification of the violation, the attorney general is authorized to prose-
cute violations under this act.
SECTION 100. That Section 39-1313, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
39-1313. INJUNCTION TO PREVENT OPERATION WITHOUT LICENSE. (1)
Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the licensing
agency may in the manner provided by law maintain an action in the name of
the state for injunction or other process against any person or governmental
unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management or oper-
ation of a facility or agency as defined, without a license under sections
39-1301--39-1314 through 39-1313, Idaho Code.
(2) The licensing agency shall be represented by the county prosecutor
of the county in which the violation occurs or by the office of the attorney
general.
SECTION 101. That Section 39-1392a, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
39-1392a. DEFINITIONS. The following terms shall have the following
meanings when used in this section:
(1) "Emergency medical services personnel" means emergency medical
services providers certified by the department of health and welfare pur-
suant to section 56-1011 et seq., Idaho Code, and ambulance-based clinicians
as defined in the rules governing emergency medical services as promulgated
by the department of health and welfare.
(2) "Group medical practice" means a partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, or other association formed for the purpose of offering
health care services through physicians and other licensed or otherwise au-
thorized health care providers who are partners, shareholders, members, em-
ployees, or contractors of such group medical practice.
(3) "Health care organization" means a hospital, in-hospital medical
staff committee, medical society, managed care organization, licensed emer-
gency medical service, group medical practice, residential care facility or
skilled nursing facility.
(4) "Hospital" means a facility in Idaho licensed under sections
39-1301 through 39-1314 39-1313, Idaho Code, and defined in section
39-1301(a)(1), Idaho Code.
(5) "In-hospital medical staff committees" means any individual doctor
who is a hospital staff member, or any hospital employee, or any group of such
doctors and/or hospital employees, who are duly designated a committee by
hospital staff bylaws, by action of an organized hospital staff, or by action
of the board of directors of a hospital, and which committee is authorized
by said bylaws, staff or board of directors, to conduct research or study of
hospital patient cases, or of medical questions or problems using data and
information from hospital patient cases.
(6) "Licensed emergency medical service" means an ambulance service or
a nontransport service licensed by the department of health and welfare pur-
suant to section 56-1011 et seq., Idaho Code.


(7) "Managed care organization" means a public or private person or or-
ganization which offers a managed care plan.
(8) "Managed care plan" means a contract of coverage given to an indi-
vidual, family or group of covered individuals pursuant to which a member is
entitled to receive a defined set of health care benefits through an orga-
nized system of health care providers in exchange for defined consideration
and which requires the member to use, or creates financial incentives for the
member to use, health care providers owned, managed, employed by or under
contract with the managed care organization.
(9) "Medical society" means any duly constituted, authorized and rec-
ognized professional society or entity made up of physicians licensed to
practice medicine in Idaho, having as its purpose the maintenance of high
quality in the standards of health care provided in Idaho or any region or
segment of the state, operating with the approval of the Idaho state board
of medicine, or any official committee appointed by the Idaho state board of
medicine.
(10) "Patient care records" means written or otherwise recorded, pre-
served and maintained records of the medical or surgical diagnostic, clini-
cal, or therapeutic care of any patient treated by or under the direction of
licensed professional personnel, including emergency medical services per-
sonnel, in every health care organization subject to this act, whether as an
inpatient or outpatient of the health care organization.
(11) "Peer review" means the collection, interpretation and analysis of
data by a health care organization for the purpose of bettering the system
of delivery of health care or to improve the provision of health care or to
otherwise reduce patient morbidity and mortality and improve the quality of
patient care. Peer review activities by a health care organization include,
without limitation:
(a) Credentialing, privileging or affiliating of health care providers
as members of, or providers for, a health care organization;
(b) Quality assurance and improvement, patient safety investigations
and analysis, patient adverse outcome reviews, and root-cause analysis
and investigation activities by a health care organization; and
(c) Professional review action, meaning an action or recommendation
of a health care organization which is taken or made in the conduct of
peer review, that is based on the competence or professional conduct of
an individual physician or emergency medical services personnel where
such conduct adversely affects or could adversely affect the health
or welfare of a patient or the physician's privileges, employment or
membership in the health care organization or in the case of emergency
medical services personnel, the emergency medical services personnel's
scope of practice, employment or membership in the health care organ-
ization.
(12) "Peer review records" means all evidence of interviews, reports,
statements, minutes, memoranda, notes, investigative graphs and compila-
tions and the contents thereof, and all physical materials relating to peer
review of any health care organization. "Peer review records" does not mean
or include patient care records; provided however, that the records relating
to the identification of which particular patient care records were selected
for, or reviewed, examined or discussed in peer review by a health care or-


ganization and the methodology used for selecting such records shall be con-
sidered peer review records.
(13) "Skilled nursing facility" means a facility licensed under chapter
13, title 39, Idaho Code, to provide skilled care to recipients.
SECTION 102. That Section 39-2411, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
39-2411. PERSONS, ACTIVITIES OR ENTITIES NOT SUBJECT TO REGULATION
UNDER THIS CHAPTER. The following are not subject to regulation for the pur-
poses of this chapter:
(1) A family member;
(2) An organization that provides only meal service in a person's resi-
dence;
(3) Entities furnishing durable medical equipment that does not in-
volve the delivery of professional services beyond those necessary to set up
and monitor the proper functioning of the equipment and educate the user on
its proper use;
(4) A professional licensed person who independently provides services
in the home;
(5) An employee or volunteer of an agency who provides nonprofessional
services only as an employee or volunteer;
(6) Facilities and institutions including, but not limited to, nursing
homes, hospitals, boarding homes, developmental disability residential
programs, or other facilities and institutions, only when providing ser-
vices to persons residing within the facility or institution if the delivery
of the services is regulated by the state;
(7) Nursing homes, hospitals, or other institutions, agencies, orga-
nizations, or persons that contract with licensed home health, hospice, or
home care agencies for the delivery of services;
(8) In-home assessments by licensed professionals of an ill, disabled,
or infirm person's ability to adapt to the home environment that does not re-
sult in regular ongoing care at home by that licensed professional;
(9) Services conducted by and for the adherents of a church or religious
denomination that rely upon spiritual means alone through prayer for healing
in accordance with the tenets' beliefs genuinely held by such adherents;
(10) A medicare approved dialysis center operating a medicare approved
home dialysis program;
(11) Case management services which do not include the direct delivery
of home health, hospice, or home care services;
(12) A medicare certified hospice agency; and
(13) A state authorized personal assistance agency or personal assis-
tant as defined in chapter 56, title 39, Idaho Code.
SECTION 103. That Section 39-3303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
39-3303. PAYMENT LEVELS.
(1)(a) Clients of the department who are receiving financial aid as
set out in sections 56-207, and 56-208 and 56-209a, Idaho Code, seek-
ing placement in a residential care or assisted living facility will be


assessed by the department regarding their need for specific types of
services and supports. This assessment will determine the reimburse-
ment rate to the service provider.
(b) Eligible participants must be allowed to choose the facility or
services that are appropriate to meet their medical needs and financial
ability to pay. The department shall promulgate rules outlining the
payment policy and calculations for clients of the department through
negotiated rulemaking.
(2) Residents who are not clients of the department shall:
(a) Be assessed by the facility regarding their need for specific types
of services and supports. This assessment, and the individual negoti-
ated service agreement, shall determine the rate charged to the resi-
dent.
(b) Receive a full description of services provided by the facility and
associated costs upon admission, according to facility policies and
procedures. A thirty (30) day notice must be provided prior to a change
in facility billing practices or policies. Billing practices shall be
transparent and understandable.
(c) Be charged for the use of furnishings, equipment, supplies and ba-
sic services as agreed upon in the negotiated service agreement or as
identified in the admission agreement.
SECTION 104. That Section 54-1704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
54-1704. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:
(1) "Accredited school or college of pharmacy" means a school or col-
lege that meets the minimum standards of the accreditation council for phar-
macy education and appears on its list of accredited schools or colleges of
pharmacy.
(2) "Board of pharmacy" or "board" means the Idaho state board of phar-
macy.
(3) "Certificate" means a license or registration issued by the board
unless specifically stated.
(4) "Chain pharmacy warehouse" means a physical location for prescrip-
tion drugs that acts as a central warehouse and performs intracompany sales
or transfers of such drugs to a group of chain pharmacies that have the same
common ownership and control.
(5) "Colicensed partner or product" means an instance where two (2) or
more parties have the right to engage in the manufacturing or marketing of
a prescription drug, consistent with the federal food and drug administra-
tion's implementation of the prescription drug marketing act.
(6) "Collaborative pharmacy practice" means a pharmacy practice where
one (1) or more pharmacists or pharmacies jointly agree to work under a pro-
tocol authorized by one (1) or more prescribers to provide patient care and
drug therapy management services not otherwise permitted to be performed by
a pharmacist under specified conditions.
(7) "Compounding" means the practice in which a pharmacist, a pre-
scriber, or, in the case of an outsourcing facility, a person under the
supervision of a pharmacist combines, mixes or alters ingredients of a drug
to create a medication tailored to the needs of an individual patient.


(8) "Counseling" or "counsel" means the effective communication by
the pharmacist of information, as set out in this chapter, to the patient or
caregiver in order to improve therapeutic outcomes by maximizing proper use
of prescription drugs and devices.
(9) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive or at-
tempted transfer of a drug or device from one person to another, whether or
not for a consideration.
(10) "Device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, con-
trivance, implant, in vitro reagent or other similar related article, in-
cluding any component part or accessory that is:
(a) Recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia or official
National Formulary, other drug compendia or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or
the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in man or other
animal;
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man
or other animal, does not achieve any of its principal intended purposes
through chemical action within or on the body of man or other animal, and
is not dependent upon being metabolized for the achievement of any of
its principal intended purposes.
(11) "Dispense" or "dispensing" means the preparation and delivery of
a drug pursuant to a lawful prescription drug order of a practitioner in a
suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to
or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription.
(12) "Distribute" means the delivery of a drug other than by administer-
ing or dispensing.
(13) "Distributor" means a supplier of drugs manufactured, produced, or
prepared by others to persons other than the ultimate consumer.
(14) "Donation repository" means:
(a) A community health center as defined in section 39-3203, Idaho
Code;
(b) A free medical clinic as defined in section 39-7702, Idaho Code;
(c) A designated regional behavioral health center as described in
chapter 31, title 39, Idaho Code;
(d) A state charitable institution as described in chapter 1, title 66,
Idaho Code; or
(e) A drug outlet as defined in this section.
(15) "Drug" means:
(a) Articles recognized as drugs in the official United States Phar-
macopoeia, official National Formulary, official Homeopathic Pharma-
copoeia, other drug compendia or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment or prevention of disease in man or other animal;
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any
function of the body of man or other animal; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified
in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection.
(16) "Drug outlet" means a resident or nonresident pharmacy, business
entity or other facility subject to registration by the board, pursuant to
section 54-1729, Idaho Code, where employees or personnel are engaged in the


practice of pharmacy, in the provision of pharmaceutical care, or in the dis-
pensing, delivering, distributing or manufacturing of drugs or devices in or
into Idaho.
(17) "Drug therapy management" means selecting, initiating, or modify-
ing drug treatment pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement.
(18) "Epinephrine auto-injector" means a single-use device for the au-
tomatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body.
(19) "Institutional drug order" means a prescription drug order issued
in the unique form and manner permitted for a patient or resident of an in-
stitutional facility or as permitted for other purposes as defined in rule.
Unless specifically differentiated, state law applicable to a prescription
drug order is also applicable to an institutional drug order.
(20) "Institutional facility" means a facility whose primary purpose is
to provide a physical environment for patients to obtain health care ser-
vices and in which patients spend a majority of their time, as may be further
defined by board rule.
(21) "Internship" means a practical experience program under the super-
vision of a preceptor.
(22) "Investigational or new drug" means any drug limited by state or
federal law to use under professional supervision of a practitioner autho-
rized by law to prescribe or administer such drug.
(23) "Labeling" means the process of preparing and affixing a label to
any drug container, exclusive however of the labeling by a manufacturer,
packer or distributor of a nonprescription drug or commercially packaged
legend drug or device. Any such label shall include all information required
by federal and state law.
(24) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion or processing of a device or a drug, either directly
or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin or indepen-
dently by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction and
chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the sub-
stance or labeling or relabeling of its container, except that this term does
not include the preparation or compounding of a drug by an individual for his
own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling of a drug:
(a) By a pharmacist or practitioner as an incident to his administer-
ing, dispensing or, as authorized by board rule, distributing of a drug
in the course of his professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner or by his authorization under his supervision
for the purpose of or as an incident to research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale.
(25) "Manufacturer" means a person who is licensed or approved by the
federal food and drug administration to engage in the manufacture of drugs,
including a colicensed partner or affiliate of that person, who compounds,
cultivates, derives, harvests, mixes, or by other process produces or pre-
pares legend drugs and includes persons who prepare such drugs in dosage
forms by mixing, compounding, encapsulating, entableting, or other process,
or who packages or repackages such drugs, but does not include pharmacists or
practitioners in the practice of their profession.
(26) "Medically indigent patient" means a resident of Idaho who:
(a) Is not eligible for medicaid or medicare;


(b) Cannot afford private prescription drug insurance; or
(c) Does not have income and other resources available sufficient to
pay for a legend drug.
(27) "Multistate license" means a license, registration, or other cre-
dential for the practice of pharmacy issued by the pharmacy licensing agency
of a state.
(28) "Multistate licensee" means a multistate pharmacist, multistate
pharmacist intern, or multistate technician.
(29) "Multistate pharmacist" means a nonresident pharmacist who is li-
censed by a party state and is not otherwise licensed by the board.
(30) "Multistate pharmacist intern" means a nonresident pharmacist in-
tern who is registered by a party state and is not otherwise licensed by the
board.
(31) "Multistate practice of pharmacy" means the practice of pharmacy
in or into Idaho for a patient located in Idaho by a multistate licensee pur-
suant to the requirements of this section and the terms of a mutual recogni-
tion agreement.
(32) "Multistate technician" means a nonresident technician who is li-
censed by a party state and is not otherwise registered by the board.
(33) "Mutual recognition agreement" means a written agreement entered
into between the board and a party state allowing for the multistate prac-
tice of pharmacy, subject to the requirements of this section and any other
reasonable and supplemental contract terms negotiated by the board and the
party state.
(34) "Nonprescription drugs" means medicines or drugs that may be sold
without a prescription drug order and that are prepackaged for use by the
consumer and labeled in accordance with state and federal law.
(35) "Nonresident" means a person or business entity located in the Dis-
trict of Columbia or a state or territory other than Idaho that practices
pharmacy including, but not limited to, pharmaceutical care services into
Idaho.
(36) "Off-site pharmacy services" means services provided by a central
drug outlet or an off-site pharmacist or technician. Services may include,
but are not limited to: processing a request from another pharmacy to fill,
refill or dispense a prescription drug order; performance of processing
functions; or providing cognitive or pharmaceutical care services. Each
function may be performed by the same or different persons and at the same or
different locations.
(37) "Opioid antagonist" means naloxone hydrochloride or any other sim-
ilarly acting and equally safe drug approved by the federal food and drug ad-
ministration for the treatment of drug overdose.
(38) "Outsourcing facility" means a pharmacy or facility that is regis-
tered by the federal food and drug administration pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 353b
and either registered or endorsed by the board.
(39) "Party state" means any pharmacy licensing agency of a state that
has entered into a mutual recognition agreement with the board.
(40) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, associa-
tion or any other legal entity.
(41) "Person in charge" or "PIC" means a person whose qualifications,
responsibilities, and reporting requirements are defined in rule.


(42) "Pharmaceutical care" means drug therapy and other pharmaceutical
patient care services intended to achieve outcomes related to the cure or
prevention of a disease, elimination or reduction of a patient's symptoms,
or arresting or slowing of a disease process as defined in the rules of the
board.
(43) "Pharmacist" means an individual licensed by this state to engage
in the practice of pharmacy or a pharmacist registered by this state who is
located in another state, territory or the District of Columbia and is en-
gaged in the practice of pharmacy into Idaho, unless exempted.
(44) "Pharmacist intern" means a person who is enrolled in or who has
completed a course of study at an accredited school or college of pharmacy
and is registered with the board as a pharmacist intern prior to commencement
of an internship.
(45) "Pharmacy" means any drug outlet, facility, department, or other
place where prescription drug orders are filled or compounded and where
prescriptions are sold, dispensed, offered, or displayed for sale and that
has, as its principal purpose, the dispensing of drug and health supplies
intended for the general health, welfare, and safety of the public.
(46) "Practice of pharmacy" means the safe interpretation, evaluation,
compounding, administration, and dispensing of prescription drug orders,
patient counseling, collaborative pharmacy practice, provision of pharma-
ceutical care services, proper storage of drugs and devices, and prescribing
of drugs and devices as may be further defined in this chapter.
(47) "Practitioner" means a person licensed in this state and permitted
by such license to dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer
drugs in the course of professional practice or research in this state.
(48) "Preceptor" means a pharmacist or other health professional li-
censed and in good standing who supervises the internship training of a
registered pharmacist intern.
(49) "Precursor" means a substance, other than a legend drug, that is an
immediate chemical intermediate that can be processed or synthesized into a
legend drug and is used or produced primarily for use in the manufacture of a
legend drug.
(50) "Prepackaging" means the act of transferring a drug, manually or
using an automated system, from a manufacturer's original container to an-
other container prior to receiving a prescription drug order.
(51) "Prescriber" means an individual currently licensed, registered
or otherwise authorized to prescribe and administer drugs in the course of
professional practice.
(52) "Prescriber drug outlet" means a drug outlet in which prescription
drugs or devices are dispensed directly to patients under the supervision of
a prescriber, except where delivery is accomplished only through on-site ad-
ministration or the provision of drug samples, patient assistance program
drugs, or investigational drugs as permitted in chapter 94, title 39, Idaho
Code.
(53) "Prescription drug or legend drug" means a drug that under federal
law is required, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled with
one (1) of the following statements:
(a) "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without a prescrip-
tion"; or


(b) "Rx Only"; or
(c) "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order
of a licensed veterinarian";
or a drug that is required by any applicable federal or state law or rule to be
dispensed on prescription drug order only or is restricted to use by practi-
tioners only.
(54) "Prescription drug order" means a valid order of a prescriber for a
drug or device for an ultimate user of the drug or device.
(55) "Primary state of residence" means the multistate licensee's de-
clared primary state of residence as evidenced by a valid state or federal
identification card with a home address or another form of identification
accepted by the board.
(56) "Prospective drug review" includes, but is not limited to, the fol-
lowing activities:
(a) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for known allergies, ra-
tional therapy contraindications, reasonable dose and route of admin-
istration, and reasonable directions for use;
(b) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for duplication of ther-
apy;
(c) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for drug, food, or dis-
ease interactions; and
(d) Evaluation of the prescription drug order for proper utilization.
(57) "Qualified donor" means:
(a) Any entity that meets the definition of "donation repository" as
provided in this section; or
(b) Any member of the public in accordance with section 54-1762, Idaho
Code.
(58) "Record" means all papers, letters, memoranda, notes, prescrip-
tions, drug orders, invoices, statements, patient medication charts or
files, computerized records or other written indicia, documents or objects
that are used in any way in connection with the purchase, sale or handling of
any drug or device.
(59) "Repackage" means repackaging or otherwise changing the con-
tainer, wrapper, or labeling to further the distribution of a prescription
drug, excluding such actions when completed by the pharmacist responsible
for dispensing product to the patient.
(60) "Reverse distributor" means a drug outlet that receives nonsalable
prescription drugs from persons or their agents, who may lawfully possess
prescription drugs without being issued a valid prescription drug order, and
that processes for credit or disposes of such prescription drugs.
(61) "Sale" means every sale and includes:
(a) Manufacturing, processing, transporting, handling, packaging or
any other production, preparation or repackaging;
(b) Exposure, offer, or any other proffer;
(c) Holding, storing or any other possession;
(d) Dispensing, giving, delivering or any other supplying; and
(e) Applying, administering or any other usage.
(62) "Technician" means an individual authorized by registration with
the board to perform pharmacy support services under the direction of a phar-
macist.


(63) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a drug for
his own use or for the use of a member of his household or for administering to
an animal owned by him or by a member of his household.
(64) "USP" means United States pharmacopoeia.
(65) "Veterinary drug outlet" means a prescriber drug outlet that dis-
penses drugs or devices intended for animal patients.
(66) "Wholesale distribution" means distribution of prescription drugs
to persons other than a consumer or patient, but does not include:
(a) Drug returns, when conducted by a hospital, health care entity, or
charitable institution in accordance with 21 CFR 203.23;
(b) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase,
or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug pursuant to a prescription;
(c) The delivery of, or offer to deliver, a prescription drug by a
common carrier solely in the common carrier's usual course of business
of transporting prescription drugs when such common carrier does not
store, warehouse, or take legal ownership of the prescription drug; or
(d) The sale or transfer from a community pharmacy or chain pharmacy
warehouse of expired, damaged, mispicked, returned, or recalled pre-
scription drugs to the original manufacturer, original wholesaler, or
third-party returns processor, including a reverse distributor.
(67) "Wholesaler" means a person who, in the usual course of business,
lawfully distributes drugs or devices in or into Idaho to persons other than
the ultimate user.
SECTION 105. That Section 55-819, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-819. REQUIREMENTS REGARDING A REQUEST FOR NOTICE OF TRANSFER OR
ENCUMBRANCE -- RULEMAKING. (1) If the department of health and welfare has
recorded a request for notice of transfer or encumbrance pursuant to section
56-225, Idaho Code:
(a) When a title insurance company or agent discovers the presence of a
request for notice of transfer or encumbrance recorded in the real prop-
erty records in the county in which the property described in such no-
tice is located while performing a title search on such property and any
individual identified in such notice is the record owner of such prop-
erty, the title insurance company or agent shall disclose the presence
of the request for notice of transfer or encumbrance in any commitment
to offer to issue a title insurance product to insure title to such real
property; and
(b) If, after the date of the recording the request for notice of
transfer or encumbrance described in subsection (1) paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the individual identified in such request for notice
transfers or encumbers real property described in such filing, such
individual, his agent or family member shall provide the department of
health and welfare with a notice of transfer or encumbrance within ten
(10) days after the date of the transfer or encumbrance. For the pur-
poses of this subsection (1)(b) paragraph, a title insurance company
or agent shall not be deemed or appointed an agent of the individual
identified in the request for notice of transfer or encumbrance. The
department of health and welfare shall adopt by rule a model form for


notice of transfer or encumbrance to be used by said individual when
notifying the department.
(2) If the department of health and welfare has caused to be recorded a
termination of request for notice of transfer or encumbrance in the grants
and conveyances records pursuant to section 56-225, Idaho Code, or if no in-
dividual identified in the request for notice of transfer or encumbrance is
the record owner of the real property described therein, the title insurance
company or agent is not required to disclose the notice of transfer or encum-
brance as required by subsection (1)(a) of this section, and an individual
transferring or encumbering the real property after the date of such record-
ing is not required to provide the notice of transfer or encumbrance required
by subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The notice of transfer or encumbrance described in subsection
(1)(a) of this section is personal to the individual named therein and shall
not constitute a lien or encumbrance on, or prevent the transfer or encum-
brance of, the property described therein. A title insurance company or
agent shall have no liability to the department of health and welfare or any
person or entity for failing to discover, or for disclosing, the request for
notice of transfer or encumbrance as required by subsection (1)(a) of this
section.
SECTION 106. That Section 56-214, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-214. AWARD OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE -- INELIGIBILITY UPON TRANSFER OF
PROPERTY. (1) Upon the completion of the investigation, the state department
shall determine whether the applicant is eligible for public assistance un-
der the provisions of this act, the type and amount of public assistance he
shall receive, and the date upon which such public assistance shall begin.
Public assistance shall be paid in the manner prescribed by the state depart-
ment.
(1) (2) Assistance to families with children shall not be granted under
this act to any person who within six (6) months prior to applying for or at
any time during which such assistance is received, has either made an assign-
ment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering himself eligible
for assistance under this act, or who has divested himself of any interest in
property without adequate consideration which interest or proceeds there-
from could reasonably be expected to contribute to the support and mainte-
nance of such person and his family, except that any person who is ineligible
for public assistance due solely to such assignment or transfer shall become
eligible provided:
(a) There is a showing that such person has caused such property to be
assigned or transferred back to him; or
(b) There is a showing that the person to whom such property is as-
signed or transferred has, subsequent to such assignment or transfer,
met subsistence and medical care costs exclusive of any obligation for
support, of such person or family, according to the department's as-
sistance standard, equal to, or in excess of, the market value of the
property so assigned or transferred; or
(c) There is a showing that the subsistence and medical care costs of
such person, according to the department's assistance standard, subse-


quent to such assignment or transfer, equal or exceed the market value
of the property so assigned or transferred.
(2) (3) Eligibility for old age assistance under section 56-207, Idaho
Code, or aid to the blind under section 56-208, Idaho Code, or aid to the dis-
abled under section 56-209a, Idaho Code, shall be determined by continuing
to consider as available any resource that was transferred prior to July 1,
1988, until such resource is fully accounted for under the provisions of sec-
tion 1613(c) of the social security act as such section read on June 30, 1988.
(3) (4) Eligibility for medical assistance under section 56-209b,
Idaho Code, shall continue to apply the rules of the director of the depart-
ment of health and welfare concerning transfer of property as such rules read
on October 29, 1988, to transfers that occur prior to July 1, 1989, to persons
other than to the spouse of the person receiving or applying for medical as-
sistance, and to interspousal transfers that occur prior to October 1, 1989.
(4) (5) The provisions of section 1917(c) of the social security act
as amended by public law 100-360 and further amended by public law 100-485
and as hereafter amended shall apply as of July 1, 1989, to transfers of as-
sets other than to the spouse, and as of October 1, 1989, to transfers be-
tween spouses, except that such provisions shall not apply either to trans-
fers that occurred before July 1, 1988, or to transfers that have been fully
accounted for under subsection (3) (4) of this section. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, any transfer of assets not otherwise specifically permitted by
federal law or rule of the department not for fair market value is presumed
to be for the purpose of sheltering assets to qualify for medical assistance.
Such assets transferred shall be counted as available in determining eligi-
bility, and will subject the applicant to penalties prescribed by the direc-
tor, unless the applicant for assistance can demonstrate by clear and con-
vincing evidence that the transfer was intended for another purpose.
(5) (6) Any funds, securities, accounts, contracts and all other
property held in or transferred to a special needs trust as provided in
chapter 14, title 68, Idaho Code, section 15-5-409, Idaho Code, and section
15-5-409a, Idaho Code, shall not be considered by the state department in
determining whether the applicant is eligible for public assistance under
the provisions of this act, so long as the action is permitted under the pro-
visions of section 1917(c) and (d) of the social security act, as amended.
(6) (7) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not af-
fect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provi-
sions of this section are severable.
SECTION 107. That Section 56-234A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
56-234A. DEFINITIONS. As used in sections 56-234 through 56-235E
56-235D, Idaho Code:
(1) "Admission-discharge committee" means an interdisciplinary team
of at least three (3) individuals designated by the director to evaluate
persons as required by the provisions of sections 56-234 through 56-235E
56-235D, Idaho Code. Each committee member must be specially qualified by


training and experience in the diagnosis and treatment of persons with a
developmental disability.
(2) "Certified family home" means a family home as defined in section
39-3502, Idaho Code.
(3) "Community facility" means a privately owned or operated nursing
facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual disabil-
ities, licensed residential or assisted living facility, other organization
licensed, recognized, or certified by the department to provide care or
treatment to persons with developmental disabilities, or a publicly owned or
operated facility licensed for eight (8) beds or less as an intermediate care
facility for persons with intellectual disabilities.
(4) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(5) "Developmental disabilities" means a chronic disability of a per-
son as defined in section 66-402, Idaho Code.
(6) "Director" means the director of the Idaho department of health and
welfare or his designee.
(7) "Discharge" means an admission-discharge committee has determined
that there is an available community facility or private residence that is
least restrictive, appropriate and consistent with the needs of the individ-
ual.
(8) "Medically fragile" means an individual with a developmental dis-
ability and a chronic medical condition that is characterized by periods of
acute exacerbation or potentially life-threatening episodes and that may
require frequent hospitalizations or prolonged recuperation periods and
ongoing monitoring and assistance by a licensed registered nurse.
(9) "Private residence" means a certified family home or a single fam-
ily dwelling or apartment in a multiple dwelling or apartment complex that is
used by an individual as a place of abode and that is not used for commercial
purposes.
(10) "Resident" means an individual who is admitted to or resides at the
southwest Idaho treatment center.
(11) "Transfer" means relocating and moving a person who is a resident
of the southwest Idaho treatment center from that institution to a community
facility or private residence or from one (1) community facility or private
residence to another. Transfer does not include relocating or moving a resi-
dent of the southwest Idaho treatment center between rooms or beds within the
southwest Idaho treatment center.
SECTION 108. That Section 56-1036, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
56-1036. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that acciden-
tal poisoning is a serious public health problem in the state of Idaho and
is a problem that disproportionately affects Idaho's children. It further
finds that a significant reduction in the morbidity and mortality resulting
from such accidental poisonings has occurred as a result of the services pro-
vided by the poison control center.
(2) The purpose of sections 56-1036 through 56-1040 56-1039, Idaho
Code, is to declare legislative support for the important work of the poison
control center and to assure, by statute, the continued existence of the
poison control center.


(3) The legislature finds that the poison control center has saved
lives and reduced suffering associated with poisoning by providing emer-
gency telephone assistance and treatment referral to victims of such
incidents, by providing immediate treatment information to health care pro-
fessionals, and by providing public education and prevention programs.
(4) The legislature recognizes that enhanced cooperation between the
emergency medical system and poison control centers will aid in responding
to emergencies resulting from exposure to poisons and that, by providing
telephone assistance to individuals with possible exposure to poisons, the
need for emergency room and professional office visits will be reduced. As
a result, the cost of health care to those who may have been poisoned will be
avoided or reduced and appropriate treatment will be assured.
SECTION 109. That Section 56-1037, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
56-1037. POISON CONTROL CENTER ESTABLISHED -- SERVICES OFFERED. The
director of the department of health and welfare (for purposes of sections
56-1036 through 56-1040 56-1039, Idaho Code, "director") shall establish,
and provide support in a manner consistent with sections 56-1036 through
56-1040 56-1039, Idaho Code, a statewide poison control center. The poison
control center shall offer the following services:
(1) Provide twenty-four (24) hour emergency telephone management and
treatment referral of victims of poisoning to include determining whether
treatment can be accomplished at the scene of the incident or transport to
an emergency treatment or other facility is required, and carrying out tele-
phone follow-up to families and other individuals to assure that adequate
care is provided;
(2) Provide information to health professionals involved in management
of poisoning and overdose victims; and
(3) Provide coordination and development of community education pro-
grams designed to inform the public and members of the health professions of
poison prevention and treatment methods and to improve awareness of poison-
ing problems, occupational risks and environmental exposures.
SECTION 110. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.